Alaska, session 34, SB40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 44.12.183. Hispanic Heritage Month. The period between September 15 06 and October 15 of each year is established as Hispanic Heritage Month. Hispanic 07 Heritage Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and 08 private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities to honor and recognize the 09 contributions that Hispanic Americans have made in the history and culture of this 10 state and the United States. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.